fst/guessnouns.lexc
Multichar_Symbols 
+N
+Sg 
+Pl
+Masc 
+Fem
+Obl
+Dir
^GuessNounI
^GuessNounII
^GuessNounIII
^GuessNounIV

! Masc ending in ा
! Ex: लड़का
LEXICON NounI
+N+Masc+Sg+Dir:0 #;
+N+Masc+Pl+Dir:^े #;
+N+Masc+Sg+Obl:^े #;
+N+Masc+Pl+Obl:^ों #;

! Masc without ा
LEXICON NounII
+N+Masc+Sg+Dir:0 #;
+N+Masc+Sg+Obl:0 #;
+N+Masc+Pl+Dir:0 #;
+N+Masc+Pl+Obl:^ओं #;

! Fem like लड़की प्रति चिड़िया
LEXICON NounIII
+N+Fem+Sg+Dir:0 #;
+N+Fem+Sg+Obl:0 #;
+N+Fem+Pl+Dir:^ियाँ #;
+N+Fem+Pl+Obl:^ियों #;

! Fem like मेज़
LEXICON NounIV
+N+Fem+Sg+Dir:0 #;
+N+Fem+Sg+Obl:0 #;
+N+Fem+Pl+Dir:^एँ #;
+N+Fem+Pl+Obl:^ओं #;

LEXICON Root
^GuessNounI NounI; ! Ex: लड़का
लड़का NounI;
^GuessNounII NounII; ! Ex: घर
आदमी NounII;
मकान NounII;
हिन्दू NounII;
^GuessNounIII NounIII; ! Ex: लड़की प्रति चिड़िया
लड़की NounIII;
प्रति NounIII;
चिड़िया NounIII;
^GuessNounIV NounIV; ! Ex: मेज़
मेज़ NounIV;
